Connecticut, session 2026, SB00413.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsections (b) to (d), inclusive, of section 14-253a of the
2026 supplement to the general statutes are repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(b) (1) The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall accept applications
and renewal applications for removable windshield placards from [(1)]
(A) any person who is blind, as defined in section 1-1f; [(2)] (B) any
person with disabilities; [(3)] (C) any parent or guardian of any person
who is blind or any person with disabilities, if such person is under
eighteen years of age at the time of application; [(4)] (D) any parent or
guardian of any person who is blind or any person with disabilities, if
such person is unable to request or complete an application; and [(5)] (E)
any organization which meets criteria established by the commissioner
and which certifies to the commissioner's satisfaction that the vehicle for
which a placard is requested is primarily used to transport persons who
are blind or persons with disabilities.

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
(2) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, on and after
October 1, 2011, the commissioner shall not accept applications for
special license plates, but shall accept renewal applications for such
plates that were issued prior to October 1, 2011.
(3) No person shall be issued a placard in accordance with this section
unless such person is the holder of a valid motor vehicle operator's
license, or identification card issued in accordance with the provisions
of section 1-1h, as amended by this act. The commissioner may adopt
regulations, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54, for the
issuance of placards to persons who, by reason of hardship, do not hold
or cannot obtain an operator's license or identification card. The
commissioner shall maintain a record of each placard issued to any such
person.
(4) Such applications and renewal applications shall be on a form
prescribed by the commissioner. The application and renewal
application shall include:
(A) (i) Certification by a licensed physician, a licensed physician
assistant, an advanced practice registered nurse licensed in accordance
with the provisions of chapter 378, or a member of the driver training
unit for persons with disabilities established pursuant to section 14-11b,
that the applicant meets the definition of a person with a disability
which limits or impairs the ability to walk, as defined in 23 CFR 1235.2,
as amended from time to time; [or (B)] (ii) certification by a psychiatrist
who is employed by, or under contract with, the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs that the applicant [(i)] (I) is a veteran, as
defined in subsection (a) of section 27-103, who has post-traumatic stress
disorder certified as service-connected by the United States Department
of Veterans Affairs, and [(ii)] (II) meets the definition of a person with a
disability which limits or impairs the ability to walk, as defined in 23
CFR 1235.2, as amended from time to time; [. In] or (iii) in the case of
persons who are blind, [the application or renewal application shall
Public Act No. 26-24 2 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
include] certification of legal blindness [made] by the Department of
Aging and Disability Services, an ophthalmologist or an optometrist;
(B) (i) A list of each criterion that qualifies an applicant as a person
with a disability which limits or impairs the ability to walk, and (ii)
instruction to the certifying health care professional to select the
applicable criterion and initial each selected criterion to indicate that
such selected criterion forms the basis for the certification; and
(C) A quick response code or comparable electronic identifier that
will enable the certifying health care professional or any person using
such code or identifier to access educational materials developed by the
Accessible Parking Advisory Council, established under section 14-
253c, as amended by this act, concerning the requirements to obtain a
removable windshield placard.
(5) Any certification issued by a health care professional pursuant to
this section shall be based upon such person's professional opinion after
having completed a medically reasonable assessment of the applicant's
medical history and current medical condition made in the course of a
bona fide health care professional-patient relationship. Any person who
makes a certification required by this subsection shall sign the
application or renewal application under penalty of false statement
pursuant to section 53a-157b. The commissioner, in said commissioner's
discretion, may accept the discharge papers of a disabled veteran, as
defined in section 14-254, in lieu of such certification. The Commissioner
of Motor Vehicles may require additional certification at the time of the
original application or at any time thereafter. If a person who has been
requested to submit additional certification fails to do so within thirty
days of the request, or if such additional certification is deemed by the
Commissioner of Motor Vehicles to be unfavorable to the applicant, the
commissioner may refuse to issue or, if already issued, suspend or
revoke such special license plate or placard.
Public Act No. 26-24 3 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
(6) The commissioner shall not issue more than one placard per
applicant, except the commissioner shall issue one placard to each
applicant who is a parent or guardian of any person who is blind or any
person with disabilities, provided no more than two such placards shall
be issued on behalf of such person.
(7) The fee for the issuance of a temporary removable windshield
placard shall be five dollars.
(8) Any person whose application has been denied or whose special
license plate or placard has been suspended or revoked shall be afforded
an opportunity for a hearing in accordance with the provisions of
chapter 54.
(c) Any person who meets the requirements to obtain a removable
windshield placard pursuant to subsection (b) of this section and who
has a motorcycle registered in such person's name shall be issued, upon
approval of the application, number plates in accordance with the
provisions of subsection (a) of section 14-21b, which shall bear letters or
numerals or any combination thereof followed by the symbol of access.
The registration of any motorcycle for which a special license plate is
issued shall expire and be renewed as provided in section 14-22 and be
subject to the fee provisions of section 14-49. No person shall be issued
such number plates for the registration of more than two motorcycles.
Any person eligible to obtain a special license plate pursuant to this
section who transfers the expired registration of a motorcycle owned by
such person and replaces such number plate with a special license plate
shall be exempt from payment of any fee for such transfer or
replacement. A person who obtains a special plate or plates under this
subsection may also obtain a removable windshield placard in
accordance with subsection (b) of this section.
(d) (1) Any placard issued pursuant to this section shall be displayed
by hanging it from the front windshield rearview mirror of the vehicle
Public Act No. 26-24 4 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
when utilizing a parking space reserved for persons who are blind and
persons with disabilities. If there is no rearview mirror in such vehicle,
the placard shall be displayed in clear view on the dashboard of such
vehicle.
(2) On and after October 1, 2023, any placard issued pursuant to this
section shall not bear the words "parking permit for persons with
disabilities". Any placard issued prior to October 1, 2023, that is
otherwise valid, shall remain valid, according to its terms, until the
expiration of such placard.
(3) The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles, in consultation with the
Accessible Parking Advisory Council, shall redesign the removable
windshield placard such that the date of expiration is printed in
conspicuous boldface font and prominent when such placard is viewed
from outside the motor vehicle. On and after January 1, 2027, any
placard issued pursuant to this section shall be the redesigned placard.
Any placard issued prior to January 1, 2027, that is otherwise valid, shall
remain valid, according to its terms, until the expiration of such placard.
Sec. 2. Subsection (a) of section 14-253c of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) There is established an Accessible Parking Advisory Council,
which shall be within the Department of Motor Vehicles for
administrative purposes only. The advisory board shall: (1) Develop a
strategy to detect, deter and prevent fraud and misuse from occurring
with regard to the issuance and use of removable windshield placards
for persons who are blind and persons with disabilities from occurring
without adversely impacting persons who are blind and persons with
disabilities, (2) review the laws in other states concerning the issuance
and use of such removable windshield placards, (3) recommend best
practices for policies and regulations regarding the application for, and
Public Act No. 26-24 5 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
issuance and use of, removable windshield placards and the
enforcement of subsection (l) of section 14-253a, (4) identify and make
recommendations regarding streetscape issues that interfere with the
ability of a person who is blind or person with disabilities to access and
use public and private areas reserved for exclusive use by persons who
are blind or persons with disabilities, (5) make educational materials,
including, but not limited to, videos or online trainings, available to
[medical] health care professionals, as defined in section 14-253a, as
amended by this act, law enforcement officers and the general public
regarding the proper issuance and use of such removable windshield
placards, and (6) review the status of such removable windshield
placards issued to persons who are blind and persons with disabilities
prior to January 1, 2010, for the lifetime of such persons.
Sec. 3. Subsection (d) of section 14-36a of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective January
1, 2027):
(d) (1) A license of any class that contains the designation "Q"
indicates eligibility to operate fire apparatus. A "Q" endorsement shall
signify that the holder [either] has been trained to operate fire apparatus
in accordance with standards established by the Commission on Fire
Prevention and Control, [or] has qualifying military training and
experience as described in subdivision (2) of this subsection or has
recognition for a credential, endorsement or classification issued by
another state as described in subdivision (3) of this subsection. Except
as provided in subdivision (2) or (3) of this subsection, no such
endorsement shall be issued to any person until such person
demonstrates personally to the commissioner, or the commissioner's
designee, including the Connecticut Fire Academy, any regional fire
school or the chief local fire official of any municipality, as defined in
section 7-323j, by means of testing in a representative vehicle that such
person possesses the skills necessary for operation of fire apparatus.
Public Act No. 26-24 6 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
(2) If the holder of a license of any class is (A) a veteran who applies
to the commissioner for a "Q" endorsement not later than two years after
the date of discharge from the military and who, not more than two
years prior to such discharge, met the conditions and limitations set
forth in 49 CFR 383.77(a)(2) or 49 CFR 383.77(b)(2), as amended from
time to time, or (B) a member of the armed forces or the National Guard
who applies to the commissioner for a "Q" endorsement and who meets
the conditions and limitations set forth in 49 CFR 383.77(a)(2) or 49 CFR
383.77(b)(2), as amended from time to time, the commissioner shall
waive the requirement under subdivision (1) of this subsection to
demonstrate that such veteran or member possesses the skills necessary
for operation of fire apparatus. The commissioner shall prescribe the
form and manner by which such veteran or member shall apply for such
waiver. As used in this subparagraph, "veteran" and "armed forces"
have the same meanings as provided in section 27-103.
(3) If the holder of an out-of-state motor vehicle operator's license
with a credential, endorsement or classification that permits such person
to operate fire apparatus in such other state applies to the commissioner
for a "Q" endorsement, the commissioner shall waive the requirement
under subdivision (1) of this subsection if the Commission on Fire
Prevention and Control finds such license with a credential,
endorsement or classification was issued by such other state with
standards substantially equivalent to or exceeding the standards of this
state.
Sec. 4. Subdivision (32) of section 14-1 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(32) "Electric scooter" means a device (A) that weighs not more than
one hundred ten pounds, (B) that has two or three wheels and
handlebars, (C) that is designed to be ridden on in an upright or seated
position, (D) that is powered by an electric motor and human power,
Public Act No. 26-24 7 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
and (E) whose maximum speed, with or without human propulsion on
a paved level surface, is not more than twenty miles per hour. "Electric
scooter" does not include an electric bicycle or one-wheeled vehicle;
Sec. 5. Section 14-153b of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) For the purposes of this section, "passenger motor vehicle" does
not include (1) a passenger motor vehicle classified as full-size elite,
premium, premium elite, luxury, luxury elite, oversize, [or] special,
open air all-terrain, sport or convertible by ACRISS, formerly known as
the Association of Car Rental Industry System Standards, or a successor
to its functions, or (2) a sport utility vehicle designed to transport six or
more passengers.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, no person, firm
or corporation engaged in the business of renting or leasing passenger
motor vehicles without drivers, for periods of thirty days or less, shall
require any customer to show proof that such customer holds a credit
card as a condition to the rental of a passenger motor vehicle; provided
such person, firm or corporation may require that a customer, seeking
to rent for cash, apply for approval to rent up to three business days
before the expected rental and that such customer provide both suitable
identification and a reasonable deposit.
(c) No person, firm or corporation engaged in the business of renting
or leasing passenger motor vehicles without drivers, for periods of
thirty days or less, shall require an additional driver of any customer to
show proof that the additional driver holds a credit card or debit card
as a condition to the rental of a passenger motor vehicle to the customer,
provided such additional driver shows proof of a valid motor vehicle
operator's license and the customer shows proof that the customer holds
a credit card or debit card.
Public Act No. 26-24 8 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
Sec. 6. Subdivision (2) of section 13a-175p of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(2) "Eligible bridge" means a vehicular bridge or vehicular structure
owned by and located within one or more municipalities in the state, the
physical condition of which requires it be removed, replaced,
reconstructed, rehabilitated or improved as determined by the
commissioner.
Sec. 7. Subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of section 14-10 of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(2) "Motor vehicle record" means any record that pertains to an
operator's license, instruction or learner's permit, identity card,
registration, certificate of title or any other document issued by the
Department of Motor Vehicles; [. "Motor vehicle record" does not
include any record relating to vessels and certificates of title for vessels,
as provided in section 15-210;]
Sec. 8. Subsection (f) of section 14-10 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(f) The commissioner may disclose personal information from a
motor vehicle record to:
(1) Any federal, state or local government agency in carrying out its
functions or to any individual or entity acting on behalf of any such
agency, [or]
(2) Any individual, organization or entity that signs and files with the
commissioner, under penalty of false statement as provided in section
53a-157b, a statement on a form approved by the commissioner,
Public Act No. 26-24 9 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
together with such supporting documentation or information as the
commissioner may require, that such information will be used for any
of the following purposes:
(A) In connection with matters of motor vehicle or driver safety and
theft, motor vehicle emissions, motor vehicle product alterations, recalls
or advisories, performance monitoring of motor vehicles and dealers by
motor vehicle manufacturers, motor vehicle market research activities
including survey research, motor vehicle product and service
communications and removal of nonowner records from the original
owner records of motor vehicle manufacturers to implement the
provisions of the federal Automobile Information Disclosure Act, 15
USC 1231 et seq., the Clean Air Act, 42 USC 7401 et seq., and 49 USC
Chapters 301, 305 and 321 to 331, inclusive, as amended from time to
time, and any provision of the general statutes enacted to attain
compliance with said federal provisions;
(B) In the normal course of business by the requesting party, but only
to confirm the accuracy of personal information submitted by the
individual to the requesting party;
(C) In connection with any civil, criminal, administrative or arbitral
proceeding in any court or government agency or before any self-
regulatory body, including the service of process, an investigation in
anticipation of litigation by an attorney-at-law or any individual acting
on behalf of an attorney-at-law and the execution or enforcement of
judgments and orders, or pursuant to an order of any court provided
the requesting party is a party in interest to such proceeding;
(D) In connection with matters of motor vehicle or driver safety and
theft, motor vehicle emissions, motor vehicle product alterations, recalls
or advisories, performance monitoring of motor vehicles and motor
vehicle parts and dealers, producing statistical reports and removal of
nonowner records from the original owner records of motor vehicle
Public Act No. 26-24 10 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
manufacturers, provided the personal information is not published,
disclosed or used to contact individuals except as permitted under
subparagraph (A) of this subdivision;
(E) By any insurer or insurance support organization or by a self-
insured entity or its agents, employees or contractors, in connection
with the investigation of claims arising under insurance policies,
antifraud activities, rating or underwriting;
(F) In providing any notice required by law to owners or lienholders
named in the certificate of title of towed, abandoned or impounded
motor vehicles;
(G) By an employer or its agent or insurer to obtain or verify
information relating to a holder of a passenger endorsement or
commercial driver's license required under 49 USC Chapter 313, and
sections 14-44 to 14-44m, inclusive;
(H) In connection with any lawful purpose of a labor organization, as
defined in section 31-77, provided (i) such organization has entered into
a contract with the commissioner, on such terms and conditions as the
commissioner may require, and (ii) the information will be used only for
the purposes specified in the contract other than campaign or political
purposes;
(I) For bulk distribution for surveys, marketing or solicitations
provided the commissioner has obtained the express consent of the
individual to whom such personal information pertains;
(J) For the purpose of preventing fraud by verifying the accuracy of
personal information contained in a motor vehicle record, including an
individual's photograph or computerized image, as submitted by an
individual to a legitimate business or an agent, employee or contractor
of a legitimate business, provided the individual has provided express
consent in accordance with subdivision (5) of subsection (a) of this
Public Act No. 26-24 11 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
section;
(K) Inclusion of personal information about persons who have
indicated consent to become organ and tissue donors in a donor registry
established by a procurement organization, as defined in section 19a-
289a;
(L) By any private detective or private detective licensed in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 534, in connection with an
investigation involving matters concerning motor vehicles;
(M) By a state marshal, for use in the performance of duties under the
provisions of section 6-38a. Such information including, but not limited
to, (i) operator photos, and (ii) records produced by providing an
operator's license number, number plate or vehicle identification
number, may be requested and provided to a state marshal
electronically, or by such other means, within a reasonable time. Such
records may be transmitted to a state marshal by means of an existing
electronic system used by the Department of Motor Vehicles for the
transmission of records. The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles may
charge a state marshal a reasonable annual fee for access to such records
and the use of such electronic system, or
(3) Any individual who provides proof of current ownership of a
vessel for the purpose of obtaining the name and address of the last
person who registered such vessel.
Sec. 9. Subsection (h) of section 14-10 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(h) Notwithstanding any provision of this section, the disclosure of
personal information from a motor vehicle record pursuant to
subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection (f) of this section shall be subject to
the provisions of section 14-50a concerning (1) the fees that shall be
Public Act No. 26-24 12 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
charged for copies of or information pertaining to motor vehicle records,
and (2) the authority of the commissioner to establish fees for
information furnished on a volume basis in accordance with such terms
and conditions regarding the use and distribution of such information
as the commissioner may prescribe.
Sec. 10. Subsection (a) of section 15-144 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) (1) Any owner desiring to obtain a vessel registration number or
registration decal shall apply to the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles
and shall file such proof of ownership of the vessel as the commissioner
may require. Upon receipt of an application in proper form and the
numbering fee, the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall assign a
registration number or registration decal and provide the owner with a
temporary certificate of number or temporary certificate of decal. The
Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall issue two registration decals and
a permanent certificate.
(2) A registration decal shall be displayed on each side of the vessel
at the bow in a manner prescribed by the Commissioner of Energy and
Environmental Protection. The certificate shall state the name of the
owner, [his] the owner's address, a description of the vessel, its hull
identification number, the expiration date of the certificate and such
other information as the Commissioner of Energy and Environmental
Protection may prescribe by regulations. Such certificate shall be carried
aboard and shall be available for inspection upon the vessel for which it
is issued whenever the owner or any person authorized by [him] the
owner is aboard such vessel, except that the certificate of number for a
vessel which is less than twenty-six feet and which is rented for
noncommercial purposes for less than twenty-four hours may be
retained on shore by the owner of such vessel or [his] the owner's agent
at the place where such vessel departs or returns. If such certificate is
Public Act No. 26-24 13 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
retained on shore, a rental agreement signed by the owner or [his] the
owner's agent and by the person renting the vessel shall be carried
aboard such vessel and shall be available for inspection. Such rental
agreement shall contain the vessel number which appears on the
certificate of number and the length of time for which such vessel is
rented.
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 1-217 and 14-10, as
amended by this act, the Commissioner of Energy and Environmental
Protection may disclose, at no cost, the name and address of the last
person who registered a vessel to any individual who provides proof of
current ownership of such vessel.
Sec. 11. Subsection (h) of section 15-144 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(h) (1) Any person who operates or any owner who permits the
operation of a vessel on the waters of this state which has not been
numbered or registered in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter and any other applicable section of the general statutes shall
have committed a violation and shall be fined not less than twenty-five
dollars or more than two hundred dollars for the first offense and for
each subsequent offense shall be fined not less than two hundred dollars
or more than five hundred dollars. (2) No person shall use any vessel
registration or registration decals that have been issued to another
person pursuant to this section and sections 15-142 [to 15-144, inclusive]
and 15-143. No person shall use a vessel registration or registration
decals on any vessel other than the vessel for which such registration
number or registration decals have been issued. Any person who
violates any provision of this subdivision shall be fined not more than
two hundred fifty dollars. (3) Any officer empowered to enforce the
provisions of this chapter and any other applicable section of the general
statutes who finds a vessel which is not numbered or registered in
Public Act No. 26-24 14 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
accordance with the provisions of this chapter and such discovery is
subsequent to a violation of this chapter may make application to the
court for a warrant to seize such vessel and take it into custody pending
proof of payment of proper numbering or registration fees. No officer
shall be liable for any act performed under the provisions of this
subsection.
Sec. 12. Subsection (a) of section 14-15e of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) (1) For the purposes of this section, "Commissioner of Motor
Vehicles" or "commissioner" means the Commissioner of Motor
Vehicles or any employee of the Department of Motor Vehicles who is
acting for, or on behalf of, the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles.
[(a) (1)] (2) Except as provided in subdivision [(2)] (3) of this
subsection, no person, firm or corporation shall engage in the business
of electronically filing applications for the issuance of a certificate of
registration or a certificate of title for motor vehicles with the
Department of Motor Vehicles, unless such person, firm or corporation
holds an electronic issuance license issued by the Commissioner of
Motor Vehicles.
[(2)] (3) A motor vehicle dealer licensed in accordance with section
14-52 and acting pursuant to subsection (c) of section 14-12, subsection
(b) of section 14-61 or section 14-61a, a person, firm or corporation
engaging in the business of leasing or renting motor vehicles without
drivers in this state and acting pursuant to section 14-15 or a contractor
authorized pursuant to subsection (b) of section 14-41, may use the
department's electronic system for filing applications for the issuance of
a certificate of registration or certificate of title, as the case may be,
without obtaining an electronic issuance license. The commissioner
shall not issue an electronic issuance license to any such motor vehicle
Public Act No. 26-24 15 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
dealer, person, firm or corporation or contractor.
[(3)] (4) The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles may require any
person, firm or corporation that files, on average, five or more
applications for the issuance of a certificate of registration or a certificate
of title for motor vehicles each month with the Department of Motor
Vehicles to file such applications electronically and obtain an electronic
issuance license. Any such person, firm or corporation that fails or
refuses to file an application for such issuance electronically upon the
request of the commissioner shall pay a fee of twenty-five dollars to the
commissioner for each such application submitted.
Sec. 13. Section 14-52a of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(a) For the purposes of this section, "Commissioner of Motor
Vehicles" or "commissioner" means the Commissioner of Motor
Vehicles or any employee of the Department of Motor Vehicles who is
acting for, or on behalf of, the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles.
[(a)] (b) The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles may, after notice and
hearing, refuse to grant or renew a license to a person, firm or
corporation to engage in the business of selling or repairing motor
vehicles pursuant to the provisions of section 14-52 if any individual
named in an application for the issuance of such license has been found
liable in a civil action for odometer fraud or operating a dealer, repairer
or motor vehicle recycler business without a license, convicted of a
violation of any provision of laws pertaining to the business of a motor
vehicle dealer or repairer, including a motor vehicle recycler, or
convicted of any violation of any provision of laws involving fraud,
larceny or deprivation or misappropriation of property, in the courts of
the United States or any state. Upon renewal of such license, a licensee
shall make full disclosure of any such civil judgment or conviction
Public Act No. 26-24 16 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
under penalty of false statement. Each individual named in an
application, on a form as prescribed by the commissioner, for the
issuance of such a license shall submit to fingerprint-based state and
national criminal history records checks conducted in accordance with
section 29-17a. The commissioner may require a person, firm or
corporation to submit its application electronically.
[(b)] (c) The commissioner shall not, after notice and hearing, grant
or renew a license to an applicant for or the holder of a used car dealer's
license that is delinquent in the payment of sales tax in connection with
a business from which it is or was obligated to remit sales tax, as
reported to the commissioner by the Department of Revenue Services.
Sec. 14. Subsection (a) of section 14-73 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) (1) For the purposes of this section, "Commissioner of Motor
Vehicles" or "commissioner" means the Commissioner of Motor
Vehicles or any employee of the Department of Motor Vehicles who is
acting for, or on behalf of, the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles.
[(a) (1)] (2) No person shall be employed by a drivers' school to give
instruction in driving a motor vehicle unless such person is licensed to
act as an instructor or master instructor by the Commissioner of Motor
Vehicles.
[(2)] (3) The drivers' school employing an instructor's licensee or a
master instructor's licensee shall be responsible for ensuring any such
licensee is in compliance with the requirements of this part and any
regulations adopted under section 14-78.
Sec. 15. Section 14-178 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
Public Act No. 26-24 17 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
(a) If a certificate of title of a vehicle is lost, stolen, mutilated or
destroyed or becomes illegible, the first lienholder or, if none, the owner
or legal representative of the owner named in the certificate, as shown
by the records of the commissioner, shall promptly make application for
and may obtain a replacement upon furnishing information, including
personal identification acceptable and satisfactory to the commissioner.
Upon receiving an application for a replacement, the commissioner shall
check the identification number of the vehicle shown in the application
against the record of vehicles required to be maintained by section 14-
173 and against the record of stolen and converted vehicles required to
be maintained by section 14-197.
(b) The replacement certificate of title shall contain the legend "This
is a replacement title and may be subject to the rights of a person under
the original certificate." Except as provided in subsection (b) of section
14-175, the commissioner shall present or mail the replacement
certificate to the first lienholder named in the replacement certificate or,
if none, to the owner.
[(b)] (c) A person recovering an original certificate of title for which a
replacement has been issued shall promptly surrender the original
certificate to the commissioner.
Sec. 16. Subsection (a) of section 10-29a of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is amended by adding subdivision (139) as follows
(Effective from passage):
(NEW) (139) The Governor shall proclaim the second Monday in July
of each year as Accessible Parking Awareness Day, to promote the value
of accessible parking, encourage responsible use of accessible parking
spaces and strengthen public education and collaboration. Suitable
exercises may be held in the State Capitol and elsewhere as the
Governor designates for the observance of the day.
Public Act No. 26-24 18 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
Sec. 17. Subsection (c) of section 14-36 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(c) (1) A person who is sixteen or seventeen years of age and who has
not had a motor vehicle operator's license or right to operate a motor
vehicle in this state suspended or revoked may apply to the
commissioner for a youth instruction permit. The commissioner may
issue a youth instruction permit to an applicant after the applicant has
(A) passed a test as to knowledge of the laws concerning motor vehicles
and the rules of the road, (B) paid the fee required by subsection (v) of
section 14-49, (C) passed a vision screening conducted by the
Department of Motor Vehicles or submitted to the commissioner the
results of a vision examination conducted by a licensed medical
professional, as defined in section 14-46b, that certifies that the applicant
meets the vision standards established in regulations adopted pursuant
to section 14-45a, and (D) filed a certificate, in such form as the
commissioner prescribes, requesting or consenting to the issuance of the
youth instruction permit and the motor vehicle operator's license,
signed by (i) one or both parents or foster parents of the applicant, as
the commissioner requires, (ii) the legal guardian of the applicant, (iii)
the applicant's spouse, if the spouse is eighteen years of age or older, or
(iv) if the applicant has no qualified spouse and such applicant's parent
or foster parent or legal guardian is deceased, incapable, domiciled
outside of this state or otherwise unavailable or unable to sign or file the
certificate, the applicant's stepparent, grandparent, or uncle or aunt by
blood or marriage, provided such person is eighteen years of age or
older. The commissioner may, for the more efficient administration of
the commissioner's duties, appoint any drivers' school licensed in
accordance with the provisions of section 14-69 or any secondary school
providing instruction in motor vehicle operation and highway safety in
accordance with section 14-36e to issue a youth instruction permit,
subject to such standards and requirements as the commissioner may
Public Act No. 26-24 19 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
prescribe in regulations adopted in accordance with the provisions of
chapter 54. Each youth instruction permit shall expire two years from
the date of issuance or on the date the holder of the permit is issued a
motor vehicle operator's license, whichever is earlier. Any holder of a
youth instruction permit who attains eighteen years of age may retain
such permit until the expiration of such permit. (2) The youth
instruction permit shall entitle the holder, while such holder has the
permit in his or her immediate possession, to operate a motor vehicle on
the public highways, provided such holder is under the instruction of,
and accompanied by, a person who holds an instructor's license issued
under the provisions of section 14-73, as amended by this act, or a
person twenty years of age or older who has been licensed to operate,
for at least four years preceding the instruction, a motor vehicle of the
same class as the motor vehicle being operated and who has not had his
or her motor vehicle operator's license suspended by the commissioner
during the four-year period preceding the instruction. (3) Unless the
holder of the permit is under the instruction of and accompanied by a
person who holds an instructor's license issued under the provisions of
section 14-73, as amended by this act, no passenger in addition to the
person providing instruction shall be transported unless such passenger
is either (A) a parent or legal guardian of the holder of the permit, or (B)
a sibling of such holder of the permit and such sibling also holds a youth
instruction permit issued under the provisions of this section. (4) The
holder of a youth instruction permit who (A) is an active member of a
certified ambulance service, as defined in section 19a-175, (B) has
commenced an emergency vehicle operator's course that conforms to
the national standard curriculum developed by the United States
Department of Transportation, and (C) has had state and national
criminal history records checks conducted by the certified ambulance
service or by the municipality in which such ambulance service is
provided, shall be exempt from the provisions of subdivisions (2) and
(3) of this subsection only when such holder is driving to or from the
location of the ambulance for purposes of responding to an emergency
Public Act No. 26-24 20 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
call. (5) The commissioner may revoke any youth instruction permit
used in violation of the limitations imposed by subdivision (2) or (3) of
this subsection.
Sec. 18. Section 14-62a of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
October 1, 2026):
(a) No dealer licensed under the provisions of section 14-52 shall
advertise the price of any motor vehicle unless the stated price in such
advertisement includes the federal tax, the cost of delivery, dealer
preparation, any fee, charge or cost imposed for any add-on consumer
good or consumer service, any dealer conveyance fee or processing fee
and any other charges of any nature and such advertisement (1) states
in at least eight-point bold type that any state or local tax [,] or
registration fees [or dealer conveyance fee or processing fee, as defined
in subsection (a) of section 14-62,] are excluded from such advertised
price, (2) separately states, in at least eight-point bold type, immediately
next to the phrase "Dealer Conveyance Fee", the amount of such dealer
conveyance fee or processing fee, and (3) separately states, in at least
eight-point bold type, immediately next to the phrase "Additional Fees,
Charges and Costs", the amount of any fee, charge or cost imposed for
any add-on consumer good or consumer service. For the purposes of
this subsection, (A) "dealer conveyance fee" and "processing fee" have
the same meanings as provided in subsection (a) of section 14-62, (B)
"consumer good" has the same meaning as provided in section 42-110r,
and (C) "consumer service" has the same meaning as provided in
subsection (a) of section 42-158ff.
(b) Any new or used car dealer violating the provisions of this section
shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars. The Commissioner
of Motor Vehicles may suspend or revoke, in accordance with section
14-64, the license of any such dealer violating the provisions of this
section.
Public Act No. 26-24 21 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
Sec. 19. Subsection (b) of section 14-62 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(b) (1) The selling price quoted by any dealer to a prospective buyer
shall (A) include [,] any dealer conveyance fee or processing fee, and (B)
separately [stated,] state the amount of [the] any such dealer conveyance
fee or processing fee and that such fee is negotiable. [No dealer
conveyance fee shall be added to the selling price at the time the order
is signed by the buyer.]
(2) The selling price quoted by any dealer to a prospective buyer shall
both (A) include any fee, charge or cost imposed for any optional add-
on consumer good or consumer service, and (B) separately state the
amount of each such fee, charge or cost and that such fee, charge or cost
is optional.
(3) No dealer shall include in the selling price a dealer preparation
charge for any item or service for which the dealer is reimbursed by the
manufacturer or any item or service not specifically ordered by the
buyer and itemized on the invoice.
(4) The form used by a dealer for the order and invoice shall not be
printed in advance of discussions with a prospective buyer to include
the amount of any dealer conveyance fee or processing fee or any fee,
charge or cost imposed for any other optional add-on consumer good or
consumer service.
Sec. 20. Section 42-133r of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
As used in sections 42-133r to 42-133ee, inclusive, as amended by this
act, and sections 22 and 24 of this act, unless the context indicates a
different meaning:
Public Act No. 26-24 22 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
(1) "Manufacturer" means any person who manufactures or
assembles new motor vehicles, or imports motor vehicles for
distribution to dealers or through distributors, or factory branches.
(2) "Distributor" means any person who offers for sale, sells or
distributes any new motor vehicle to dealers or who maintains factory
representatives or who controls any person, firm, association, joint
venture corporation or trust, who offers for sale, sells or distributes any
new motor vehicle to dealers.
(3) "Factory branch" means a branch office maintained by a
manufacturer for the purpose of selling, or offering for sale, motor
vehicles to a distributor or dealer, or for directing or supervising factory
or distributor representatives.
(4) "Owner" means any person holding an ownership interest in a
business entity operating as a dealer or under a franchise as defined in
this section either as a corporation, partnership or sole proprietorship.
To the extent that the rights of any owner under sections 42-133r to 42-
133ee, inclusive, as amended by this act, conflict with the rights of any
other owner, such rights shall accrue in priority order based on the
percentage of ownership interest held by each owner with the owner
having the greatest ownership interest having first priority and
succeeding priority accruing to other owners in the descending order of
their percentage of ownership interest.
(5) "Dealership facilities" means real estate, buildings, fixtures and
improvements which are used in the course of business under a
franchise by a new motor vehicle dealer.
(6) "Dealer" means any person engaged in the business of selling,
offering to sell, soliciting or advertising the sale of new motor vehicles
and who holds a valid sales and service agreement, franchise or
contract, granted by a manufacturer or distributor for the retail sale of
Public Act No. 26-24 23 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
the manufacturer's or distributor's new motor vehicles.
(7) "Motor vehicle" means a self-propelled vehicle intended primarily
for use and operation on the public highways, other than a farm tractor
or other machinery or tools used in the production, harvesting and care
of farm products.
(8) "New motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle which has been sold
to a new motor vehicle dealer and which has not been used for other
than demonstration purposes and on which the original title has not
been issued from the new motor vehicle dealer.
(9) "Established place of business" means a permanent, commercial
building easily accessible and open to the public at reasonable times and
at which the business of a new motor vehicle dealer, including the
display and repair of vehicles, may be lawfully carried on.
(10) "Franchise" means a written agreement or contract between a
manufacturer or distributor and a dealer which purports to fix the legal
rights and liabilities of the parties to such agreement or contract, and
pursuant to which the dealer purchases and resells the franchise
product or leases or rents the dealership premises.
(11) "Good faith" means honesty in fact and the observance of
reasonable commercial standards of fair dealing in the trade.
(12) "Designated family member" means the spouse, child,
grandchild, parent, brother or sister of an owner who, in the case of the
owner's death, is entitled to inherit the ownership interest in the dealer
under the terms of the owner's will, or who has been nominated in any
other written instrument, or who, in the case of an incapacitated owner
of a dealer, has been appointed by a court as the legal representative of
the dealer's property.
(13) "Person" means a natural person, partnership, corporation,
Public Act No. 26-24 24 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
limited liability company, association, trust, estate or any other legal
entity.
(14) "Relevant market area" means the area within a radius of
fourteen miles around an existing dealer or the area of responsibility
defined in a franchise, whichever is greater.
(15) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles.
(16) "Substantial alteration" means an alteration that has a major
impact on the architectural features, characteristics, appearance or
integrity of a structure located on a dealership facility or a lot upon
which a dealership facility is located. "Substantial alteration" does not
include routine maintenance, such as painting and repairs reasonably
necessary to maintain a dealership facility in attractive condition or any
changes to items protected by federal intellectual property rights.
(17) "Consumer data" means "nonpublic personal information" as
such term is defined in 15 USC 6809(4), as amended from time to time,
that is collected by a dealer and provided by the dealer directly to a
manufacturer, distributor, factory branch or third party acting on behalf
of a manufacturer, distributor or factory branch. "Consumer data" does
not include the same or similar data obtained by a manufacturer from
any source other than the dealer or the dealer's data management
system.
(18) "Data management system" means a computer hardware or
software system that: (A) Is owned, leased or licensed by a dealer,
including, but not limited to, a system of web-based applications,
computer software or computer hardware; (B) is located at the
dealership or hosted remotely; and (C) stores and provides access to
consumer data collected or stored by a dealer.
Sec. 21. Section 42-133cc of the general statutes is amended by adding
subdivisions (23) and (24) as follows (Effective October 1, 2026):
Public Act No. 26-24 25 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
(NEW) (23) (A) Require a dealer to construct, renovate or make
substantial alterations to the dealer's facilities unless the manufacturer
or distributor can demonstrate that such construction, renovation or
alteration requirements are reasonable and justifiable based on
reasonable business consideration, including current and reasonably
foreseeable projections of economic conditions existing in the
automotive industry at the time such action would be required of the
dealer, and agrees to make a good faith effort to make available, at the
dealer's option, a reasonable quantity and mix of new motor vehicles,
which, after a reasonable analysis of market conditions, are projected to
meet the sales level necessary to support the increased overhead
incurred by the dealer as a result of the required construction,
renovation or alteration, provided a dealer may be required by a
manufacturer or distributor to make reasonable facility improvements
and technological upgrades necessary to support the technology of the
manufacturer's or distributor's vehicles. If the dealer chooses not to
make such facility improvements or technological upgrades, the
manufacturer or distributor shall not be obligated to provide the dealer
with the vehicles that require the improvements or upgrades. A
manufacturer or distributor may not require a dealer to construct,
renovate or make substantial alterations to the dealer's facility if the
dealer has completed a construction, renovation or substantial alteration
to the same component of the facility that was required and approved
by the manufacturer or distributor within the previous ten years. If a
dealer has completed facility construction, renovation or substantial
alteration under and in compliance with an incentive program, the
manufacturer or distributor may not deny a dealer payment or benefits
according to the terms of the program in place when the dealer began to
perform under the program. If the incentive program under which the
dealer completed a facility construction, renovation or substantial
alteration on or after October 1, 2026, does not contain a specific time
period during which the manufacturer or distributor shall provide
payments or benefits to a dealer, the manufacturer or distributor may
Public Act No. 26-24 26 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
not deny the dealer payment or benefits under the terms of that
incentive program, as it existed when the dealer began to perform under
the program for the balance of ten years after the manufacturer or
distributor made the program available to the dealer, regardless of
whether the manufacturer's or distributor's facility program has been
changed or cancelled. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to
require a manufacturer or distributor to provide payment or benefits if
changes have been made to the facility since the manufacturer's or
distributor's approval that would render the facility not in compliance
with the manufacturer's or distributor's standards or plans, regardless
of whether the manufacturer's or distributor's image program has
changed. Facility changes that are necessitated due to damage sustained
from a natural disaster or as a result of necessary safety upgrades shall
not be considered a change to the facility that renders the facility not in
compliance with the manufacturer's or distributor's standards or plans,
provided such facility changes substantially restore the facility to the
previous or current compliant state. Eligibility for facility-related
incentives under this subdivision shall not apply to: (i) Lump sum
payments for the cost of the facility upgrade; and (ii) any facility-related
incentive program in effect with one or more dealers in the state on
October 1, 2026;
(B) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to allow a dealer
to: (i) Impair or eliminate a manufacturer's or distributor's intellectual
property or trademark rights or impair other intellectual property
interests owned or controlled by the manufacturer or distributor,
including the design and use of signs; or (ii) refuse to change the design
or branding of any signage or other branded items required by a
manufacturer or distributor at any time, provided the manufacturer or
distributor requires such changes of all of its franchised dealers
nationally;
(NEW) (24) Require a dealer who is constructing, renovating or
Public Act No. 26-24 27 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
substantially altering its dealership facility to purchase goods, building
materials or services for the dealership facility, including, but not
limited to, office furniture, design features, flooring and wall coverings,
from a vendor chosen by the manufacturer or distributor if goods,
building materials or services of a substantially similar appearance,
function, design and quality are available from other sources and the
dealer has received the manufacturer's or distributor's approval,
provided such approval shall not be unreasonably withheld or delayed.
In the event that a manufacturer or distributor does not approve the
dealer's use of substantially similar goods, building materials or
services, the manufacturer or distributor shall provide the dealer, in
writing at the time of disapproval, a detailed list of reasons why the
proposed substantially similar items are not acceptable. Nothing in this
subdivision shall be construed to allow a dealer to impair or eliminate a
manufacturer's or distributor's intellectual property or trademark rights
and brand image standards, or impair other intellectual property
interests owned or controlled by the manufacturer or distributor,
including the design and use of signs.
Sec. 22. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this subsection,
(1) "stop-sale order" means a notification issued by a manufacturer to its
dealers or by a federal agency stating that a used vehicle in inventory
shall not be sold or leased because of a federal safety recall for a defect
or noncompliance or because of a federal emissions recall, (2) "do-not-
drive order" means a notification issued by a manufacturer to its dealers
or to the registered owner of a used vehicle, or by the National Highway
Traffic Safety Administration to the registered owner of a used vehicle,
stating that the vehicle is subject to a federal safety recall for a defect or
noncompliance and including an unconditional instruction to the
recipient of the notification to not drive the vehicle until the remedy for
the recall is complete, and (3) "value of the used motor vehicle" means
the average trade-in value of the year, make and model of the used
motor vehicle determined using nationally recognized industry data or
Public Act No. 26-24 28 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
pricing guides that reflect current national and regional used motor
vehicle market conditions.
(b) If a manufacturer or federal agency issues a recall and either a
stop-sale order or a do-not-drive order on a used vehicle and the parts
or a remedy are not available to perform a recall service or repair on the
used vehicle not later than thirty days after issuing the recall, a new
vehicle dealer that is franchised to sell and service new vehicles of the
manufacturer is entitled to compensation from the manufacturer and
may file a claim with the manufacturer for each used vehicle subject to
the recall which the dealer (1) has in its used vehicle inventory on the
date on which the stop-sale order or do-not-drive order is issued, or (2)
takes into its used car inventory as a consumer trade-in related to the
sale of a new vehicle after the date on which the stop-sale order or do-
not-drive order is issued or as a return of a leased motor vehicle.
(c) Any such claim for compensation shall be in a form as prescribed
by the manufacturer. The manufacturer may prescribe the manner in
which a dealer shall demonstrate eligibility for such compensation,
including, but not limited to, the documentation required to show the
inventory status of a used vehicle, provided such demonstration of
eligibility or documentation is not unduly burdensome.
(d) Except as provided in subsections (e) and (f) of this section,
compensation for a used motor vehicle pursuant to this section shall be
calculated at a rate of not less than one per cent of the value of the used
motor vehicle per month, beginning thirty days after the date on which
the stop-sale order or do-not-drive order is issued to the dealer and
continuing until the earlier of the date: (1) The parts or a remedy for the
recall service or repair are made available to the dealer; or (2) the dealer
sells, trades or otherwise disposes of the used vehicle.
(e) Compensation due to a new vehicle dealer is limited to the amount
equal to the value of the used motor vehicle for which the compensation
Public Act No. 26-24 29 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
is paid.
(f) A manufacturer may, in lieu of compensating a new vehicle dealer
pursuant to the provisions of subsection (d) of this section: (1)
Compensate the dealer pursuant to a national recall compensation
program, if the amount of compensation owed to the dealer under the
program is not less than the amount of compensation owed to the dealer
pursuant to the provisions of subsection (d) of this section; or (2) enter
into an agreement with the dealer for an alternative form or amount of
compensation.
(g) A manufacturer may not take any action to offset or reduce the
amount of compensation owed to a new vehicle dealer pursuant to this
section, including, without limitation, through a charge-back program,
any reduction in an amount owed to the new vehicle dealer under an
incentive program or the removal of the new vehicle dealer from an
incentive program, if such action is taken, in whole or in part, because
the new vehicle dealer filed a claim for compensation pursuant to this
section. The provisions of this subsection do not apply to any action
taken by a manufacturer that is applied uniformly to all new vehicle
dealers of the same line and make of vehicles in this state.
(h) Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, any
compensation provided to a new vehicle dealer pursuant to this section
is exclusive and may not be combined with any other state or federal
recall compensation remedy.
Sec. 23. Subsection (j) of section 42-133s of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(j) All claims by dealers under this section for such labor and parts,
[and] all claims for compensation relative to any sales incentive,
marketing and advertising programs and all claims for compensation
Public Act No. 26-24 30 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
pursuant to the provisions of section 22 of this act shall be paid not later
than thirty days after approval by the manufacturer or distributor,
provided manufacturers or distributors retain the right to audit such
claims and to charge-back the dealer for false or unsubstantiated claims
for a period of one year following payment. A manufacturer or
distributor shall not deny a claim submitted under this subsection or
charge-back such a claim or payment following a timely audit based
solely on the dealer's failure to comply with a claim processing
procedure, a clerical error or other administrative technicality, provided
such failure does not call into question the legitimacy of the claim. The
manufacturer or distributor shall allow the dealer to resubmit such
claim according to reasonable manufacturer or distributor guidelines
not later than thirty days after the initial claim denial or charge-back. If
there is evidence of fraud, the provisions of this subsection shall not
limit the right of a manufacturer or distributor to audit a dealer for
longer periods of time and charge-back the dealer for any fraudulent
claim. Dealers shall be required to maintain defective parts for a period
of not longer than ninety days following submission of claims. All such
claims shall be either approved or disapproved not later than thirty days
after their receipt on forms, and in the manner specified by, the
manufacturer or distributor. Any claim not disapproved in writing or
by means of electronic transmission not later than thirty days after
receipt shall be deemed approved and payment shall be made within
thirty days.
Sec. 24. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) With respect to consumer
data, a manufacturer, distributor or a third party acting on behalf of a
manufacturer or distributor:
(1) Shall comply with, and shall not cause a dealer to violate, any
applicable restrictions on reuse or disclosure of the consumer data
established by federal or state law;
(2) Shall, upon the request of the dealer, provide a written statement
Public Act No. 26-24 31 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
to the dealer describing the established procedures adopted by such
manufacturer, distributor or third party acting on behalf of the
manufacturer or distributor that meet or exceed any federal or state
requirements to safeguard the consumer data, including, but not limited
to, the requirements in the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act, 15 USC 6801 et
seq., as amended from time to time;
(3) Shall, upon the written request of the dealer, provide a written list
of the consumer data obtained from the dealer and all persons to whom
any consumer data has been provided by the manufacturer, distributor
or a third party acting on behalf of the manufacturer or distributor
during the preceding six months. The dealer may make such a request
not more than once every six months. The list shall indicate the specific
fields of consumer data that were provided to each person, except such
list shall not be required to include: (A) A person to whom consumer
data was provided, or the specific consumer data provided to such
person, if the person was, at the time such consumer data was provided,
a service provider, subcontractor or consultant acting in the course of
performance of services on behalf of or for the benefit of the
manufacturer, distributor, third party or dealer, provided the
manufacturer, distributor, third party or dealer has entered into an
agreement with such person requiring that such person comply with the
safeguard requirements of applicable state and federal law, including,
but not limited to, the requirements in the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act, 15
USC 6801 et seq., as amended from time to time; and (B) a person to
whom consumer data was provided, or the specific consumer data
provided to such person, if the dealer has previously consented in
writing to such person receiving such consumer data and the dealer has
not withdrawn such consent in writing;
(4) May not require that a dealer grant the manufacturer, distributor
or third party acting on behalf of the manufacturer or distributor direct
or indirect access to such dealer's data management system to obtain
Public Act No. 26-24 32 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
consumer data. A manufacturer, distributor or a third party acting on
behalf of the manufacturer or distributor shall permit a dealer to furnish
consumer data in a widely accepted file format, such as comma
delimited, and through a third-party vendor selected by the dealer. A
manufacturer, distributor or a third party acting on behalf of the
manufacturer or distributor may access or obtain consumer data
directly from a dealer's data management system with the express
consent of the dealer. The consent shall be in the form of a written
document that (A) is separate from the franchise agreement, (B) is
executed by the dealer, and (C) may be withdrawn by the dealer upon
thirty days' written notice to the manufacturer or distributor. For
incentive programs beginning on or after October 1, 2026, such consent
shall not be required as a condition to a motor vehicle dealer's
participation in an incentive program unless such consent is necessary
to obtain consumer data to implement the program; and
(5) Shall indemnify the dealer for any third-party claims asserted
against or damages incurred by the dealer to the extent caused by access
to, use of or disclosure of consumer data in violation of the provisions
of this section by the manufacturer, distributor or a third party to whom
the manufacturer or distributor has provided consumer data.
(b) Nothing is this section shall be construed to limit the ability of the
manufacturer or distributor to require that the dealer provide, or use in
accordance with the law, such customer information related solely to
such manufacturer's or distributor's own vehicle makes to the extent
necessary to do any of the following:
(1) Satisfy any safety or recall notice obligations or other legal notice
obligations on the part of the manufacturer;
(2) Complete the sale and delivery of a new motor vehicle to a
customer;
Public Act No. 26-24 33 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
(3) Validate and pay customer or dealer incentives;
(4) Submit to the manufacturer or distributor claims for any services
supplied by the dealer for any claim for warranty parts or repairs;
(5) Market analysis;
(6) Evaluate sales and service customer satisfaction with the dealer,
including surveys; or
(7) Reasonable marketing purposes that benefit the dealer.
Sec. 25. Section 42-133bb of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
Notwithstanding the terms, provisions or conditions of any franchise
agreement or other agreement between a manufacturer or distributor
and a dealer, no manufacturer or distributor shall require that a dealer:
(1) Order or accept delivery of any new motor vehicle, part or
accessory, equipment or any other commodity not required by law in
connection with warranty service or a recall campaign or voluntarily
ordered by the dealer, except that the provisions of this subdivision shall
not affect terms or provisions of a franchise requiring dealers to market
a representative line of motor vehicles which the manufacturer or
distributor is publicly advertising;
(2) Order or accept delivery of any new motor vehicle with special
features, accessories or equipment not included in the list price of such
motor vehicles as publicly advertised by the manufacturer or
distributor;
(3) Pay all or part of the cost of an advertising campaign or contest,
or purchase any promotional materials, training material, showroom or
other display decorations or materials at the expense of the new motor
vehicle dealer without the consent of the new motor vehicle dealer;
Public Act No. 26-24 34 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
(4) Enter into any agreement with the manufacturer or distributor or
do any other act prejudicial to the dealer under threat of termination or
cancellation of a franchise or agreement between the dealer and the
manufacturer or distributor, except that this subdivision shall not
preclude the manufacturer or distributor from insisting on compliance
with the reasonable terms or provisions of the franchise or agreement,
and notice in good faith to any dealer of the dealer's violation of such
terms or provisions shall not constitute a violation of sections 42-133r to
42-133ee, inclusive, as amended by this act;
(5) Change the capital structure of the dealer or the means by which
the dealer finances the operation of the dealership provided the dealer
meets reasonable capital standards established by the manufacturer or
distributor in accordance with uniformly applied criteria, and provided
further that no change in the capital structure shall cause a change in the
principal management or have the effect of a sale of the franchise
without the consent of the manufacturer or distributor and such consent
shall not be unreasonably withheld;
(6) Refrain from participation in the management of, investment in,
or acquisition of any other line of new motor vehicles or related
products, provided this subdivision shall not apply unless the dealer
maintains a reasonable line of credit for each line make of new motor
vehicle, the dealer remains in compliance with any reasonable facilities
requirements of the manufacturer or distributor, and no change is made
in the principal management of the dealer;
(7) Prospectively assent to a release, assignment, novation, waiver or
estoppel which would relieve any person from liability to be imposed
by sections 42-133r to 42-133ee, inclusive, as amended by this act, or
require any controversy between a dealer and a manufacturer or
distributor, to be referred to any forum other than the Superior Court or
the United States District Court. [;
Public Act No. 26-24 35 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
(8) Construct, renovate or make substantial alterations to the dealer's
facilities unless the manufacturer or distributor can demonstrate that
such construction, renovation or alteration requirements are reasonable
and justifiable in light of current and reasonably foreseeable projections
of economic conditions, financial expectations, availability of additional
vehicle allocation and such dealer's market for the sale of vehicles.]
Sec. 26. Subdivision (31) of section 14-1 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(31) "Electric bicycle" means a bicycle equipped with operable foot
pedals and an electric motor of [fewer] not more than seven hundred
fifty watts of power that is either a class 1, class 2 or class 3 bicycle.
"Electric bicycle" does not include a dirt bike or an all-terrain vehicle;
Sec. 27. Subdivision (59) of section 14-1 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(59) "Motor-driven cycle" means (A) a one-wheeled vehicle with a
floorboard that can be stood upon while riding or with foot rests for the
operator; and (B) any of the following vehicles that have a seat height of
not less than twenty-six inches and a gasoline, electric or hybrid motor
that has a capacity of less than fifty cubic centimeters piston
displacement or a wattage not exceeding three thousand seven hundred
watts: [or that produces five brake horsepower or less:] (i) A motorcycle,
except an autocycle; (ii) a motor scooter, except an electric scooter; or
(iii) a bicycle with attached motor, except an electric bicycle;
Sec. 28. Subsection (b) of section 1-1h of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(b) (1) An identity card shall indicate its date of expiration, contain a
Public Act No. 26-24 36 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
picture of the applicant and specify the applicant's height, sex and eye
color.
(2) An original identity card shall expire within a period not
exceeding seven years following the date of the applicant's next
birthday. Any person who holds an identity card may be notified by the
commissioner before its expiration and may renew such card in such
manner as the commissioner shall prescribe. Upon renewal of an
identity card, the commissioner may issue an identity card for a period
to be determined by the commissioner, provided such period does not
exceed eight years. The fee for the renewal of an identity card that
expires eight years from the date of issuance shall be thirty-two dollars.
The commissioner shall charge a prorated amount of such fee for an
identity card that expires less than eight years from the date of issuance.
The commissioner shall not provide notification by mail to the holder of
an identity card if the United States Postal Service has determined that
mail is undeliverable to such person at the address for such person that
is in the records of the department.
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 14-36d, the
commissioner may, in the commissioner's discretion, waive any
requirement that an applicant appear in person for a new photograph
or digital image in connection with (A) the renewal of an identity card,
or (B) the issuance of an identity card to a person who holds or has held
a motor vehicle operator's license issued pursuant to section 14-36, as
amended by this act. The commissioner may grant such waiver if the
applicant is sixty-five years of age or older or has a disability or medical
condition that substantially impairs mobility or the ability to appear in
person at the department, as determined by the commissioner and the
applicant meets all other requirements for such renewal or issuance of
an identity card. In lieu of requiring a new photograph or digital image
for such renewal or issuance of an identity card, the commissioner may
use the most recent photograph or digital image of the applicant on file
Public Act No. 26-24 37 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
with the department. The commissioner may require documentation as
deemed necessary to establish eligibility for such waiver. The
commissioner may deny such waiver if the commissioner determines
such renewal or issuance of an identity card without a new photograph
or digital image would compromise the integrity of an identity card
issued under this section or facilitate fraud or misuse. If the
commissioner provides for such renewal or issuance of an identity card,
the commissioner shall establish procedures to renew or issue such
identity card by mail or electronic communication with the department.
Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to require the
commissioner to grant a waiver to an applicant. If a waiver is granted,
nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to require the renewed or
issued identity card be compliant with 6 CFR 37, as amended from time
to time.
Sec. 29. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) On and after January 1, 2027,
the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall establish and maintain a
publicly accessible and searchable electronic portal on the Internet web
site of the Department of Motor Vehicles for the purpose of providing
information concerning (1) motor vehicles subjected to nonconsensual
towing or transporting, as defined in section 14-66 of the general
statutes, as amended by this act, and (2) motor vehicles taken into
custody and stored pursuant to subsection (b) or (c) of section 14-150 of
the general statutes. The goal of the portal shall be to enable the
members of the public to determine whether a motor vehicle has been
towed or taken into custody and if applicable, the location where such
motor vehicle is stored. The portal shall (A) be available twenty-four
hours per day, (B) not require the creation of a personal account for
access to search such information, and (C) permit any wrecker service,
owner or keeper of any garage, storage facility or other place where a
towed or transported motor vehicle is stored, organized police
department or parking authority to submit information electronically to
such portal.
Public Act No. 26-24 38 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
(b) When initially designing such portal and when implementing any
material modifications, redesigns or significant maintenance updates to
such portal, the commissioner shall consult with the Towing Advisory
Council, established under section 39 of this act, to ensure the portal is
easily operated and accessible when submitting, and searching for,
information on towed and stored motor vehicles. The commissioner
shall consider whether the portal may be used to permit a wrecker
service to electronically file forms prescribed by the commissioner,
including a notice of tow, and whether such electronic filing may be
used in lieu of mailing such forms.
(c) On and after January 1, 2027, each wrecker service or the owner or
keeper of any garage, storage facility or other place where a towed or
transported motor vehicle is stored shall, not later than forty-eight hours
from the time such motor vehicle was towed or transported, submit
electronically to the portal information sufficient to identify such motor
vehicle, the location where such motor vehicle is stored, the identity and
contact information for such wrecker service or owner or keeper and
any other information as the commissioner, in consultation with the
Towing Advisory Council, may prescribe.
(d) Each such wrecker service or owner or keeper shall update the
portal with information as prescribed by the commissioner to reflect
changes in the status of any such stored motor vehicle.
(e) Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 14-51a and 14-64 of the
general statutes, the commissioner may not impose a civil penalty for a
wrecker service or owner or keeper who is unable to electronically
submit information to the portal in accordance with the provisions of
this section due to a technological issue with the portal, an electrical
outage or a temporary loss of Internet connectivity at the wrecker
service's or owner's or keeper's place of business, provided such
wrecker service or owner or keeper documents such issue, outage or loss
and electronically submits information to the portal as soon as possible
Public Act No. 26-24 39 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
after such issue is resolved or electrical service or Internet connectivity
is restored.
(f) The provisions of this section shall not apply to a wrecker service
or owner or keeper who stores a motor vehicle (1) that was towed with
the consent of the owner or operator, or (2) subject to repossession.
Sec. 30. Section 14-66e of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(a) For the purposes of this section:
(1) "Police-ordered towing" means towing or transporting and
recovery of a motor vehicle without the prior consent of authorization
of the owner or operator of the motor vehicle performed pursuant to the
provisions of section 14-150, as amended by this act, section 14-307 or
any other order of a police officer or traffic authority;
(2) "Oversize or overweight motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle,
combination of motor vehicle and trailer or commercial vehicle
combination, including each such motor vehicle's load, whose
dimensions or weight does not conform to the provisions of sections 14-
262, 14-262a, 14-264, 14-267a and 14-269 or any other requirement
specified in the general statutes;
(3) "Winching" means the process of moving a motor vehicle by the
use of chains, nylon slings or additional lengths of winch cable from a
position that is not accessible for direct hookup for towing a motor
vehicle;
(4) "Nonconsensual towing or transporting" and "recovery" have the
same meanings as provided in section 14-66, as amended by this act; and
(5) "Light-duty motor vehicle", "medium-duty motor vehicle" and
Public Act No. 26-24 40 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
"heavy-duty motor vehicle" have the same meanings as provided in
section 14-66d, as amended by this act.
(b) The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall establish and publish
a schedule of rates and charges for the provision of police-ordered
towing that includes:
(1) A base hourly rate that may be charged for towing or transporting
services provided to (A) a light-duty motor vehicle, (B) a medium-duty
motor vehicle, (C) a heavy-duty motor vehicle, and (D) an oversize or
overweight motor vehicle. The commissioner shall identify the services
and equipment involved in the provision of such towing or transporting
services that are included in such base hourly rate;
(2) An hourly rate for winching services, provided such winching
service is performed on a vehicle that is located off a paved portion of a
highway;
(3) Hourly rates or charges for each type of specialized equipment
used in connection with the provision of police-ordered towing that are
not included in the base hourly rate established pursuant to subdivision
(1) of this subsection. Such rates or charges shall account for the cost of
each such type of specialized equipment and a reasonable profit margin;
(4) Hourly rates for labor that is not included in such base hourly rate;
and
(5) A charge for necessary administrative services.
(c) The schedule of rates and charges established pursuant to the
provisions of subsection (b) of this section shall be just and reasonable
and reflect the reasonable operating costs of wrecker services that
perform police-ordered towing. In establishing such rates and charges,
the commissioner shall consider factors, including, but not limited to,
the most recent transportation producer price index published by the
Public Act No. 26-24 41 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
United States Department of [Transportation] Labor, Bureau of Labor
Statistics, rates set by other jurisdictions, rates for consensual towing of
motor vehicles, the cost of equipment required by regulations adopted
pursuant to section 29-23a, as amended by this act, and the cost of
workers' compensation insurance, unemployment compensation and
insurance premiums.
(d) Not later than [ninety] sixty days after receipt of a proposed
schedule of rates and charges and any supporting documentation from
the Police-Ordered Towing Council pursuant to section 14-66f, as
amended by this act, the commissioner shall (1) hold a public hearing
for the purpose of obtaining additional information concerning such
proposed schedule, and (2) establish and publish a schedule of rates and
charges for the provision of police-ordered towing in accordance with
subsection (e) of this section. The commissioner shall post notice of any
such public hearing on the Internet web site of the Department of Motor
Vehicles and give notice to each member of the Police-Ordered Towing
Council not less than fourteen days prior to any such public hearing. If
the commissioner amends the proposed schedule and does not issue a
preliminary schedule of rates and charges pursuant to subsection (e) of
this section, the commissioner shall provide a written explanation to the
council of the reason for such amendment.
(e) If the commissioner establishes a schedule of rates and charges
that (1) adjusts the amount of any rate or charge such that the amount is
more than ten per cent greater than or less than the rates and charges in
the proposed schedule by the Police-Ordered Towing Council pursuant
to subsection (e) of section 14-66f, as amended by this act, or (2)
eliminates or adds any charge for specialized equipment in the
proposed schedule by said council pursuant to subdivision (3) of
subsection (b) of this section, the commissioner shall issue a preliminary
schedule of rates and charges. The commissioner shall post such
preliminary schedule on the Internet web site of the Department of
Public Act No. 26-24 42 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
Motor Vehicles and provide notice of such preliminary schedule to each
member of the council. The commissioner shall provide for a period of
not less than fifteen days of public comment on such preliminary
schedule. Following the close of such public comment period, the
commissioner shall review any comments received, consider whether or
not to modify the preliminary schedule, prepare a written response to
such comments and post such response on the department's Internet
web site and provide a copy of such response to each member of the
council. Thereafter, the commissioner shall establish and publish a final
schedule of rates and charges.
(f) Any schedule of rates and charges established pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section shall be effective for a period of three years.
On January first of the second year and January first of the third year of
such three-year period, the rates and charges in effect during the
immediately preceding year shall be increased by a percentage equal to
the average of (1) the annual increase in the consumer price index for all
urban consumers for the preceding calendar year as published by the
United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, and (2)
the increase in the transportation producer price index in the preceding
calendar year as published by the United States Department of Labor,
Bureau of Labor Statistics. The commissioner shall calculate such
increase and publish the adjusted rates and charges on the Internet web
site of the Department of Motor Vehicles not later than December first
preceding the effective date of such adjusted rates and charges.
[(e)] (g) Upon the publication of a schedule pursuant to the provisions
of this section, no wrecker service shall (1) charge more than the rates
and charges contained in such schedule, or (2) charge for services that
are not included in such schedule.
(h) Any person aggrieved by any action of the commissioner under
the provisions of this section may appeal therefrom in accordance with
section 4-183, except venue for such appeal shall be in the judicial
Public Act No. 26-24 43 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
district of New Britain.
Sec. 31. Section 14-66f of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
October 1, 2026):
(a) For the purposes of this section:
(1) "Police-ordered towing" and "oversize or overweight motor
vehicle" have the same meanings as provided in section 14-66e, as
amended by this act; and
(2) "Light-duty motor vehicle", "medium-duty motor vehicle" and
"heavy-duty motor vehicle" have the same meanings as provided in
section 14-66d, as amended by this act.
(b) There is established a Police-Ordered Towing Council within the
Department of Motor Vehicles for administrative purposes only. Such
council shall (1) advise the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles concerning
policies affecting police-ordered towing, and (2) develop a proposed
schedule of rates and charges for the provision of police-ordered towing
of light-duty, medium-duty, heavy-duty and oversize or overweight
motor vehicles.
(c) [The] On and after October 1, 2026, the council shall consist of the
following members: (1) Three representatives of an organization in the
state that represents towing and recovery professionals, appointed by
the Governor; (2) two representatives of an organization in the state that
represents the commercial trucking industry, appointed by the
Governor; (3) one representative of an association of police chiefs in the
state, appointed by the Governor; (4) one representative of an
association of fire chiefs in the state, appointed by the Governor; (5) one
representative of the insurance industry, appointed by the Governor;
[and (6) the Commissioners of Transportation, Emergency Services and
Public Protection and Energy and Environmental Protection and the
Public Act No. 26-24 44 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
Insurance Commissioner, or their designees] (6) one consumer
advocate, appointed by the Governor; (7) one employee of the
Department of Transportation with experience that is related to the
work of the council, designated by the Commissioner of Transportation;
(8) one employee of the Department of Emergency Services and Public
Protection with experience that is related to the work of the council,
designated by the Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public
Protection; (9) one employee of the Department of Energy and
Environmental Protection with experience that is related to the work of
the council, designated by the Commissioner of Energy and
Environmental Protection; and (10) one employee of the Insurance
Department with experience that is related to the work of the council,
designated by the Insurance Commissioner.
(d) [Appointments] All initial appointments to the council shall be
made not later than August 1, 2025, and the initial appointments made
pursuant to subdivisions (6) to (10), inclusive, of subsection (c) of this
section shall be made not later than October 15, 2026. Each member
appointed shall serve for a term of three years and may serve until such
member's successor is appointed. Any vacancy shall be filled by the
[Governor] appointing authority not later than thirty days after the date
of such vacancy. The chairperson of the council shall be appointed by
the Governor and shall convene the first meeting of the council not later
than September 15, 2025.
(e) The council shall (1) on or before January 1, 2026, consider the
factors set forth in subsection (c) of section 14-66e, as amended by this
act, and submit to the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles a proposed
schedule of rates and charges for the provision of police-ordered towing
of light-duty, medium-duty, heavy-duty and oversize or overweight
motor vehicles; (2) in the period of time between June 1, 2028, and
September 1, 2028, inclusive, and every three years thereafter, review
and consider adjustments to the rates and charges published in
Public Act No. 26-24 45 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
accordance with section 14-66e, as amended by this act, and submit such
recommended adjustments, if any, to the commissioner; (3) recommend
specific procedures for determining whether a service performed by a
wrecker service in the provision of police-ordered towing was required;
(4) request information from other parties to assist with the work of the
council and, in the discretion of the council, hold public hearings for the
purpose of obtaining information; and (5) make any additional
recommendations to the Department of Motor Vehicles that the council
deems appropriate.
Sec. 32. Section 14-66d of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(a) For the purposes of this section:
(1) "Private-property trespass towing" means the towing or
transporting of a motor vehicle without the prior consent or
authorization of the owner or operator of the motor vehicle performed
in accordance with the provisions of section 14-145, as amended by this
act;
(2) "Light-duty motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle with a gross
vehicle weight rating of less than ten thousand pounds;
(3) "Medium-duty motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle, including
any cargo, with a gross vehicle weight rating of ten thousand pounds or
more but not more than twenty-six thousand pounds;
(4) "Heavy-duty motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle, including any
cargo, with a gross vehicle weight rating of more than twenty-six
thousand pounds;
(5) "Drop fee" means the fee payable for the release of a motor vehicle
that has been connected to a wrecker but not yet removed from private
Public Act No. 26-24 46 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
property from which such motor vehicle is to be towed;
(6) "After-hours redemption fee" means the fee payable for
redeeming a motor vehicle from a motor vehicle storage facility outside
the wrecker service's hours of operation; and
(7) "Nonconsensual towing or transporting" has the same meaning as
provided in section 14-66, as amended by this act.
(b) The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall establish and publish
a schedule of rates and charges for the provision of private-property
trespass towing and the storage of motor vehicles. Such schedule shall
be effective on January 1, 2026, and shall include (1) flat rates for towing
services provided to light-duty, medium-duty and heavy-duty motor
vehicles, (2) a fee for additional labor, (3) a drop fee, (4) a mileage fee,
(5) storage rates, and (6) an after-hours redemption fee. Not later than
November 1, 2025, the commissioner shall hold one public hearing for
the purpose of obtaining information to establish the schedule.
(c) Such flat rates shall include the first two miles of transportation
performed by such wrecker service. No wrecker service may charge a
mileage fee for more than thirteen additional miles of transportation
provided to a motor vehicle subject to private-property trespass towing.
(d) Such storage rates and the after-hours redemption fee shall apply
to the storage of light-duty, medium-duty and heavy-duty motor
vehicles subject to nonconsensual towing or transporting.
(e) The schedule of rates and charges established pursuant to the
provisions of this section shall be just and reasonable and reflect the
reasonable operating costs of wrecker services that perform private-
property trespass towing and store motor vehicles. In establishing such
rates and charges, the commissioner shall consider factors, including,
but not limited to, the most recent transportation producer price index
published by the United States Department of [Transportation] Labor,
Public Act No. 26-24 47 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
Bureau of Labor Statistics, rates set by other jurisdictions and the cost of
fuel, wreckers, motor vehicle parts, equipment, personnel, workers'
compensation insurance, unemployment compensation and insurance
premiums.
(f) Any schedule of rates and charges established pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section shall be effective for a period of three years.
For any three-year schedule of rates and charges established on or after
January 1, 2029, on January first of the second year and January first of
the third year of such three-year period, the rates and charges in effect
during the immediately preceding year shall be increased by a
percentage equal to the average of (1) the annual increase in the
consumer price index for all urban consumers for the preceding
calendar year as published by the United States Department of Labor,
Bureau of Labor Statistics, and (2) the increase in the transportation
producer price index in the preceding calendar year as published by the
United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics. The
commissioner shall calculate such increase and publish the adjusted
rates and charges on the Internet web site of the Department of Motor
Vehicles not later than December first preceding the effective date of
such adjusted rates and charges.
[(f)] (g) In the period of time between July 1, 2028, and October 1,
2028, inclusive, and every three years thereafter, the commissioner shall
hold one public hearing for the purpose of reconsidering the schedule
of rates and charges established pursuant to the provisions of subsection
(b) of this section. The commissioner shall post notice of any such public
hearing on the Internet web site of the Department of Motor Vehicles
and give written or electronic notice to each member of the Towing
Advisory Council, established pursuant to section 39 of this act, not less
than fourteen days prior to any such public hearing. The commissioner
may amend such established schedule if, after consideration of the
factors set forth in subsection (e) of this section and the testimony
Public Act No. 26-24 48 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
received at the public hearing, the commissioner determines that such
established schedule is no longer just and reasonable and does not
reflect the reasonable operating costs of wrecker services that perform
private-property trespass towing. If the commissioner amends such
schedule, such amended schedule shall be effective the January first
following each public hearing held pursuant to the provisions of this
subsection.
[(g)] (h) Upon the publication of a schedule pursuant to the
provisions of this section, no wrecker service shall (1) charge more than
the rates and charges contained in such schedule, or (2) charge for
services that are not included in such schedule.
[(h) The uniform rates and charges for the nonconsensual towing or
transporting and storage of motor vehicles with a gross vehicle weight
rating of less than ten thousand pounds established and published by
the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles pursuant to section 14-66 of the
general statutes, revision of 1958, revised to January 1, 2025, shall
continue to be effective on and after October 1, 2025, until December 31,
2025, inclusive, and no wrecker service shall charge more than such
published rates and charges during such period.]
(i) Any person aggrieved by any action of the commissioner under
the provisions of this section may appeal therefrom in accordance with
section 4-183, except venue for such appeal shall be in the judicial
district of New Britain.
Sec. 33. Subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of section 14-63 of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(2) The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall receive, process and
investigate complaints from customers of dealers and repairers
concerning the operations of and services provided by any such dealer
Public Act No. 26-24 49 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
or repairer, including the provision of nonconsensual towing or
transporting, recovery or storage of motor vehicles. The commissioner
may permit a dealer or repairer to stipulate to a complaint and waive
such dealer or repairer's right to an administrative hearing under the
provisions of chapter 54. No complaint regarding the provision of
police-ordered towing shall be brought but within two years from the
date of such police-ordered tow.
Sec. 34. Subsection (c) of section 14-66 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(c) (1) Each wrecker used for towing or transporting motor vehicles
shall be registered as a wrecker by the commissioner for a fee of one
hundred twenty-five dollars. Each such registration shall be renewed
biennially according to renewal schedules established by the
commissioner so as to effect staggered renewal of all such registrations.
If the adoption of a staggered system results in the expiration of any
registration more or less than two years from its issuance, the
commissioner may charge a prorated amount for such registration fee.
(2) Prior to the adoption of any (A) new internal policies or
procedures or modifications to existing internal policies or procedures
concerning or affecting wrecker services, or (B) new forms or
modifications to existing forms prescribed by the commissioner for use
in the business of operating a wrecker, the commissioner shall consult
with the Towing Advisory Council, established pursuant to section 39
of this act. The commissioner shall provide not less than sixty days of
written or electronic notice to each wrecker service who registered a
wrecker pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection prior to the
implementation of any such policy, procedure or form.
Sec. 35. Subsection (a) of section 29-23a of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
Public Act No. 26-24 50 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) The Division of State Police within the Department of Emergency
Services and Public Protection shall establish, within its patrol
jurisdiction, a rotational system for summoning wrecker services, as
defined in section 14-1, as amended by this act, for the purpose of
towing or transporting motor vehicles which are disabled, inoperative
or wrecked in the event the owners or operators of such vehicles are
incapacitated, unavailable or leave the procurement of wrecker service
to the officer at the scene of an accident or the location of a disabled
vehicle. Any such wrecker service may participate in such system,
provided (1) such wrecker service fulfills certain qualifications,
including certification by the Towing and Recovery Association of
America or a certification program approved by the Commissioner of
Emergency Services and Public Protection, and the wrecker service's
equipment meets safety and mechanical standards established by the
Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection and the
Commissioner of Motor Vehicles, [and] (2) the wrecker service's
business is located so as to provide prompt and efficient service, and (3)
(A) any individual owner of a wrecker service who engages in towing
or transporting motor vehicles under the rotational system completes
training provided by the Department of Transportation concerning
traffic incident management not later than July 1, 2027, or prior to
beginning participation in the rotational system, whichever is later, and
(B) any employee of a wrecker service who engages in towing or
transporting motor vehicles for a wrecker service participating in the
rotational system completes such training not later than July 1, 2027, or
within one year after the date such employee is hired or engages in
towing or transporting motor vehicles for such wrecker service,
whichever is later.
Sec. 36. Section 7-282g of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
Public Act No. 26-24 51 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
October 1, 2026):
(a) If the owner or operator of a disabled vehicle is present at the
scene of an accident or at the location of the disabled vehicle and is able
to respond, the municipal police officer shall inquire whether such
owner or operator wishes to choose a wrecker service, as defined in
section 14-1, as amended by this act, for the purposes of towing or
transporting the disabled vehicle. If such owner or operator wishes to
do so and such chosen wrecker service is on a rotational system
maintained by the municipality, if any, the police officer shall notify the
chosen wrecker service. If such chosen wrecker service cannot be
contacted or is unable or unwilling to respond in a timely manner as
determined by the municipal police officer, the municipal police officer
shall (1) summon the next available wrecker service on the rotational
system if maintained by the municipality, or (2) summon a wrecker
service as chosen by such municipal police officer.
(b) (1) Any individual owner of a wrecker service who engages in
towing or transporting motor vehicles under a rotational system
maintained by a municipality shall complete training provided by the
Department of Transportation concerning traffic incident management
not later than July 1, 2027, or prior to beginning participation in such
rotational system, whichever is later.
(2) Any employee of a wrecker service who engages in towing or
transporting motor vehicles for a wrecker service participating in a
rotational system maintained by a municipality shall complete such
training not later than July 1, 2027, or not later than one year after the
date such employee is hired or engages in towing or transporting motor
vehicles for such wrecker service, whichever is later.
Sec. 37. Section 14-150c of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
October 1, 2026):
Public Act No. 26-24 52 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
(a) Whenever a motor vehicle is taken into custody and stored
pursuant to subsection (b) or (c) of section 14-150, or is subject to
nonconsensual towing or transporting, as defined in section 14-66, as
amended by this act, the wrecker service or owner or keeper of any
garage, storage facility or other place where such motor vehicle is stored
shall have a lien upon such motor vehicle for towing or storage charges,
or both, imposed by such wrecker service or owner or keeper that result
from towing or storing a motor vehicle.
(b) (1) Except as provided in subsection (d) of section 14-150, if such
wrecker service or owner or keeper [makes a determination in good
faith that the current market value of the stored motor vehicle does not
exceed one thousand five hundred dollars and] determines such stored
motor vehicle is fifteen or more model years old and has been stored for
a period of not less than [fifteen] thirty days, such wrecker service or
owner or keeper shall, unless an application filed by the owner of such
motor vehicle pursuant to subsection (e) of section 14-150, as amended
by this act, is pending and the owner of such motor vehicle has notified
such wrecker service or owner or keeper that such application for
hearing has been filed, send a notice of intent to sell [that complies] in
accordance with subsection (c) of this section to the Commissioner of
Motor Vehicles, the owner of such motor vehicle and any known
lienholder of record of such motor vehicle at the end of such [fifteen-
day] thirty-day period. Upon approval by the commissioner of the
notice of intent to sell, the commissioner shall issue such wrecker service
or owner or keeper an affidavit of compliance. Such wrecker service or
owner or keeper shall sell such motor vehicle not less than five business
days after the mailing date of the notice of [intent] proposed sale and
apply the proceeds of the sale toward the towing and storage charges
imposed by such wrecker service or owner or keeper.
(2) If such wrecker service or owner or keeper [makes a determination
in good faith that the current market value of the stored motor vehicle
Public Act No. 26-24 53 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
exceeds one thousand five hundred dollars and if] determines such
motor vehicle is less than fifteen model years old and has been stored
for a period of not less than [forty-five] thirty days, such wrecker service
or owner or keeper shall, unless an application filed by the owner
pursuant to subsection (e) of section 14-150, as amended by this act, is
pending and the owner of such motor vehicle has notified such wrecker
service or owner or keeper that such application for a hearing has been
filed, send a notice of intent to sell [that complies] in accordance with
subsection (c) of this section to the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles, the
owner of such motor vehicle and any known lienholder of record of
such motor vehicle at the end of such [forty-five-day] thirty-day period.
Upon approval by the commissioner of the notice of intent to sell, the
commissioner shall issue such wrecker service or owner or keeper an
affidavit of compliance. Such wrecker service or owner or keeper shall
sell such motor vehicle at public auction for cash, at the place of business
of such wrecker service or owner or keeper not less than five business
days after the mailing date of the notice of [intent to sell] proposed sale.
Such wrecker service or owner or keeper shall provide notice of any
such public auction (A) by submitting electronic information regarding
such notice to the portal established pursuant to section 29 of this act,
and (B) by publishing such notice in a newspaper of general circulation
or by prominently posting such notice on such wrecker service's or
owner's or keeper's Internet web site for its business. Such owner or
keeper shall apply the proceeds of such sale toward the towing and
storage charges imposed by such wrecker service or owner or keeper,
the expenses related to such sale and any debt or obligation incurred by
the officer who placed such motor vehicle in storage in accordance with
section 14-150, as amended by this act. At any public auction held
pursuant to this section, such wrecker service or owner or keeper may
set a minimum bid equal to the amount of such wrecker service's or
owner's or keeper's charges with respect to the tow and storage of the
motor vehicle. If no such bid is made, such wrecker service or owner or
keeper may sell or dispose of such vehicle.
Public Act No. 26-24 54 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
[(3) In determining the current market value of the stored motor
vehicle pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (1) or (2) of this
subsection, the wrecker service may deduct for an observed defect or
missing major component part, as defined in section 14-149a.]
(c) (1) The notice of intent to sell described in subsection (b) of this
section shall include, but need not be limited to, (A) the make, model
and vehicle identification number of the stored motor vehicle, (B) the
date such motor vehicle was left with such wrecker service or owner or
keeper and by whom, (C) the registration number if any number plates
are on such motor vehicle, [(D) the retail market value of such motor
vehicle as determined by the wrecker service or owner or keeper, and
(E)] and (D) a statement to the owner and known lienholder that (i) the
stored motor vehicle will be sold if not redeemed in a timely manner,
(ii) such motor vehicle may be redeemed until the point-of-sale, (iii) any
proceeds of such sale, after deducting the amount due to such wrecker
service or owner or keeper and any expenses of the officer who placed
such motor vehicle in storage, if applicable, will be held in an escrow
account and paid to the owner of such motor vehicle or such owner's
legal representatives, if claimed by such owner or legal representatives
not later than one year from the date of such sale, and (iv) if such
proceeds are not claimed within said period of time, such proceeds will
escheat to the state. Such wrecker service or owner or keeper shall
provide such notice and a copy of the consumer bill of rights regarding
towing, developed pursuant to section 14-66g, as amended by this act,
to the motor vehicle owner and lienholder by [certified mail, return
receipt requested] regular mail, postage prepaid.
(2) Such wrecker service or owner or keeper shall also provide a copy
of the notice of intent to sell to the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles, in
a form and manner determined by the commissioner. Such notice of
intent to sell shall be accompanied by a filing fee of ten dollars and any
other information, such as photographs of the stored motor vehicle, that
Public Act No. 26-24 55 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
the commissioner may prescribe. Such notice of intent to sell shall be
subject to disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act, as defined
in section 1-200. The commissioner may send a copy of such notice of
intent to sell electronically to the owner or lienholder of such motor
vehicle.
(3) Any sale of a stored motor vehicle under the provisions of this
section shall be void, unless such wrecker service or owner or keeper
[provides the notices required by this subsection] sends the notice of
intent to sell and a copy of such notice in accordance with the provisions
of subsection (b) of this section and this subsection, except as provided
in subdivision (4) of this subsection.
(4) A wrecker service or owner or keeper need not send such notice
of intent to sell or a notice of proposed sale, as described in subsection
(e) of this section, to the owner of the motor vehicle if (A) the owner of
such motor vehicle has notified such wrecker service or owner or keeper
in writing that such individual does not currently own such motor
vehicle or does not wish to receive subsequent notifications regarding
the sale and disposition of such motor vehicle, or (B) the notice of tow
to the motor vehicle owner was returned as undeliverable. In any case
where such wrecker service or owner or keeper need not send such
notice of intent to sell or notice of a proposed sale, such wrecker service
or owner or keeper shall (i) retain the written notification described in
subparagraph (A) of this subdivision or the undelivered notice of tow
for a period of three years, and (ii) update the portal established
pursuant to section 29 of this act as prescribed by the commissioner.
(d) Upon receipt of a notice of intent to sell, the commissioner shall
review such notice and determine if the owner of the motor vehicle has
filed a customer complaint concerning such wrecker service or owner or
keeper pursuant to section 14-63, as amended by this act. The
commissioner shall not approve such proposed sale until any such
customer complaint is resolved. If the commissioner approves such
Public Act No. 26-24 56 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
proposed sale, the commissioner shall issue such wrecker service or
owner or keeper an affidavit of compliance.
(e) (1) Upon receipt of an affidavit of compliance by the
commissioner, such wrecker service or owner or keeper shall mail a
notice of proposed sale to the motor vehicle owner and known
lienholder by [certified mail, return receipt requested] regular mail,
postage prepaid, that indicates the date, time and place of the proposed
sale of such motor vehicle, except as provided in subdivision (4) of
subsection (c) of this section. Not less than five business days after the
mailing date of the notice of proposed sale, such wrecker service or
owner or keeper may proceed to sell such motor vehicle pursuant to the
provisions of subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection (b) of this section.
(2) In addition to the thirty-day period immediately following the
date such motor vehicle was placed in storage under [subdivision (1) of]
subsection (b) of this section, [or a sixty-day period immediately
following the date such motor vehicle was placed in storage under
subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of this section,] the wrecker service may
only charge up to ten additional days of storage for such motor vehicle
after receipt of the affidavit of compliance issued by the commissioner.
(f) At the time of a sale conducted in accordance with the provisions
of this section, such wrecker service or owner or keeper shall provide
the purchaser of such motor vehicle with the affidavit of compliance
issued by the commissioner.
(g) Not later than fifteen days after the sale of a motor vehicle in
accordance with the provisions of this section, such wrecker service or
owner or keeper of such garage shall (1) report the sale price, towing
and storage charges, repair charges, if any, expenses related to the sale,
any proceeds, the buyer's name and address, identification of the vehicle
and such other information as may be required in regulations adopted
pursuant to section 14-150d, to the commissioner, (2) deposit the
Public Act No. 26-24 57 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
proceeds of such sale, after deducting the amount due to such wrecker
service or owner or keeper and any expenses of the officer who placed
such motor vehicle in storage, if applicable, into an escrow account, and
(3) upon receipt of a claim by the prior owner of such motor vehicle or
such owner's legal representatives not later than one year from the date
of such sale, pay such sale proceeds to the prior owner or such owner's
legal representatives. If such sale proceeds are not claimed within said
period of time, such sale proceeds shall escheat to the state as unclaimed
property and the wrecker service or owner or keeper shall be subject to
the requirements of part III of chapter 32, including all obligations of a
holder of unclaimed property. Not later than ten days after filing any
report and paying any funds to the Treasurer as required by part III of
chapter 32, such wrecker service or owner or keeper shall provide
evidence to the commissioner, in a form and manner determined by the
commissioner, that such report was submitted and funds have
escheated.
[(h) In no event shall such wrecker service or owner or keeper sell a
motor vehicle that has not been (1) stored for at least thirty days if the
current market value of such motor vehicle does not exceed one
thousand five hundred dollars, or (2) stored for at least sixty days if the
current market value of such motor vehicle exceeds one thousand five
hundred dollars.]
Sec. 38. Subsection (f) of section 14-145 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(f) (1) (A) Not later than two hours after an unauthorized motor
vehicle is towed or otherwise removed by a wrecker service, or a
repossessed motor vehicle is towed or otherwise removed by a wrecker
service or an exempt entity, as described in subsection (g) of section 14-
66, the wrecker service or the exempt entity shall notify the local police
department or resident state trooper serving the municipality where the
Public Act No. 26-24 58 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
tow or removal was conducted and specify the time the motor vehicle
was towed or removed, the location from which the vehicle was
removed and the location at which the vehicle is stored. Such
notification shall be submitted, in writing, or transmitted by facsimile or
electronic mail and the record of such notification shall be retained by
such wrecker service or exempt entity in accordance with the provisions
of section 14-66b. No such wrecker service or exempt entity may charge
a storage fee for an unauthorized or repossessed motor vehicle for the
time it is stored prior to notification of the local police department or
resident state trooper by the wrecker service or exempt entity.
(B) If such motor vehicle remains unclaimed forty-eight hours after
the notification pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this subdivision, the
wrecker service or owner of the garage where such motor vehicle is
stored or the exempt entity shall immediately complete a notice of
[such] tow, on a form prescribed by the Commissioner of Motor
Vehicles, and mail a copy of such form by regular mail, postage prepaid,
and by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the owner and all
lienholders of record. If the motor vehicle is not claimed by its owner
within [the time periods specified in subsection (b) of section 14-150c]
thirty days, the wrecker service or owner of the garage where such
motor vehicle is stored or the exempt entity may dispose of such motor
vehicle in accordance with the provisions of section 14-150c, as amended
by this act.
(2) The local police department or resident state trooper, not later
than forty-eight hours after receiving notification of a tow or removal of
an unauthorized motor vehicle pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection, shall enter the vehicle identification number into the
National Crime Information Center database and the Connecticut On-
Line Law Enforcement Communications Teleprocessing System to
determine whether such motor vehicle has been reported as stolen. If
such motor vehicle has been reported as stolen, the local police
Public Act No. 26-24 59 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
department or resident state trooper shall immediately notify the
department that reported the vehicle as stolen.
Sec. 39. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) There is established a Towing
Advisory Council to advise the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles
concerning laws, regulations and best practices relating to the
provisions of nonconsensual towing or transporting and the storage,
redemption and sale of towed motor vehicles.
(b) The council shall consist of the following members, appointed by
the commissioner: (1) Two employees of the Department of Motor
Vehicles with experience that is related to the work of the council; (2)
three towing and recovery professionals in the state, with the advice and
consent of an organization that represents the majority of the towing
and recovery professionals in the state; (3) two members of a law
enforcement unit, as defined in section 7-294a of the general statutes; (4)
two consumer advocates; and (5) two representatives of the insurance
industry. The commissioner shall schedule the first meeting of the
council not later than September 1, 2026. At such first meeting, the
council shall select the chairperson from among the members of the
council. The council may consult with any other agencies, officials or
interested parties that the council deems appropriate to complete the
work of the council.
(c) Appointments to the council shall be made not later than August
1, 2026. Each member appointed shall serve for a term of three years and
may serve until such member's successor is appointed. Any vacancy
shall be filled by the commissioner not later than thirty days after the
date of such vacancy.
Sec. 40. (Effective October 1, 2026) The Towing Advisory Council,
established pursuant to section 39 of this act, shall study ways to (1)
ensure motor vehicle owners receive notices when their motor vehicles
are subjected to nonconsensual tow, (2) enhance the ability of such
Public Act No. 26-24 60 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
owners to redeem their towed motor vehicles, and (3) modernize and
improve the process of selling motor vehicles at public auction,
including the feasibility of conducting such auctions online or by third
parties, and recommend amendments to the general statutes or the
regulations adopted pursuant to section 14-65 of the general statutes to
effectuate such modernization and improvements. The council, in
accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes,
shall submit the following to the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to transportation: (A)
An interim report on its findings and recommendations not later than
January 1, 2027, and (B) a final report on its findings and
recommendations not later than January 1, 2028.
Sec. 41. Section 14-66g of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
October 1, 2026):
(a) [Not later than September 1, 2025, the] The Commissioner of
Motor Vehicles, in consultation with the Attorney General, shall
develop, and thereafter revise as necessary, a consumer bill of rights
regarding towing that includes, but is not limited to, (1) a summary of
the rights and responsibilities of a motor vehicle owner or operator if
such motor vehicle is subject to nonconsensual towing or transporting,
as defined in section 14-66, as amended by this act; (2) when a wrecker
service shall be available for the purpose of vehicle redemption and
removing any personal property from within a stored motor vehicle; (3)
the schedule of rates and charges that a wrecker service may charge for
private-property trespass towing, as defined in section 14-66d, as
amended by this act, police-ordered towing, as defined in section 14-
66e, as amended by this act, and storage; (4) a description of the records
and photographs that an owner or operator may request from the
wrecker service pursuant to the provisions of section 14-145, as
amended by this act; (5) a warning that a wrecker service may sell towed
Public Act No. 26-24 61 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
vehicles pursuant to section 14-150c, as amended by this act; [and] (6)
information on filing a customer complaint with the commissioner
pursuant to section 14-63, as amended by this act; and (7) on and after
January 1, 2027, the Internet web site address of the portal established
pursuant to section 29 of this act and a brief description of the
information that may be obtained at such web site. The commissioner
shall, at a minimum, revise the consumer bill of rights each time the
commissioner publishes a schedule of rates and charges for the
provision of private-property trespass towing in accordance with
section 14-66d, as amended by this act, or police-ordered towing in
accordance with section 14-66e, as amended by this act. The
commissioner shall publish the consumer bill of rights in English and
Spanish and make the consumer bill of rights available for public
dissemination.
(b) On and after October 1, 2025, the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles
shall post the consumer bill of rights regarding towing on the Internet
web site of the Department of Motor Vehicles and the Attorney General
shall post such bill of rights on the Internet web site of the Attorney
General.
(c) On and after October 1, [2025] 2026, a wrecker service shall (1) post
the consumer bill of rights at the wrecker service's place of business,
[and] (2) make copies of such bill of rights available for distribution to
customers who visit such place of business, and (3) include with each
notice of tow mailed to the motor vehicle owner and lienholders of
record (A) such bill of rights, and (B) an itemized towing bill that (i)
states the charges owed for towing and transporting and the daily
storage rate, and (ii) includes a statement that charges for storage will
continue to accrue at such daily storage rate until the motor vehicle is
redeemed and charges for necessary administrative services will be
accessed at the time of redemption. If a wrecker service maintains an
Internet web site for its business, the wrecker service shall prominently
Public Act No. 26-24 62 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
post such bill of rights on such Internet web site.
Sec. 42. Subsection (e) of section 14-150 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(e) Within forty-eight hours of the time that a motor vehicle is taken
into custody and stored pursuant to subsection (b) or (c) of this section,
the affixing department or parking authority shall [give written notice]
provide a notice of tow and a copy of the consumer bill of rights,
developed pursuant to section 14-66g, as amended by this act, both by
regular mail, postage prepaid, and by certified mail, return receipt
requested, to the owner and any lienholders of such motor vehicle, if
such motor vehicle appears on the records of the Department of Motor
Vehicles [. The wrecker service that took such motor vehicle into
custody shall make a reasonable effort to identify the owner or
lienholders of such motor vehicle and send written notice by certified
mail, return receipt requested, to the owner and any lienholders of such
motor vehicle] and submit electronic information concerning such
motor vehicle to the portal established pursuant to section 29 of this act.
The notice of tow provided by the affixing department [,] and parking
authority [and wrecker service] shall state: (1) That the motor vehicle
has been taken into custody and stored, (2) the location of storage of the
motor vehicle, (3) that, unless title has already vested in the municipality
pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, such motor vehicle may be
sold in accordance with section 14-150c, as amended by this act, and (4)
that the owner has a right to contest the validity of such taking by
submitting an application, on a form prescribed by the Commissioner
of Motor Vehicles, to the hearing officer named in such notice within ten
days from the date of such notice. Such application forms shall be made
readily available to the public at all offices and on the Internet web site
of the Department of Motor Vehicles, parking authorities authorized
under an ordinance adopted pursuant to section 7-204a to enforce
Public Act No. 26-24 63 of 64

Substitute Senate Bill No. 413
parking regulations and state and local police departments.
Sec. 43. (Effective from passage) The Police-Ordered Towing Council
shall study and make recommendations concerning the operational
considerations of towing and storing electric vehicles, as defined in
section 16-19ee of the general statutes. Such study shall include, but
need not be limited to, (1) a comparison of the operating costs of towing
and storing electric vehicles with the costs of towing and storing motor
vehicles operated by an internal combustion engine, and (2) whether the
hourly rate established pursuant to section 14-66e of the general
statutes, as amended by this act, reflects the operating costs of towing
and storing electric vehicles. Not later than January 1, 2027, the council
shall submit the results of the study and any recommendations to the
joint standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to transportation.
Governor's Action:
Approved May 27, 2026
Public Act No. 26-24 64 of 64